Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-109 Third party ownership.
The word, insured, as used in this part, shall not be construed as preventing a
person other than the insured with a proper insurable interest from making
application for and owning a policy covering the insured, or from being
entitled under such a policy to any indemnities, benefits, and rights provided
therein. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next